Hawaii statutes.
§302L-5 Early learning trust fund.
There is established within the state treasury the early learning trust fund,
to be administered by the executive office on early learning, into which shall
be deposited all moneys received by the office in the form of:

(1) Fees;

(2) Grants;

(3) Donations;

(4) Appropriations made by the legislature to the
fund; and

(5) Revenues regardless of their source,

and earnings on moneys in the fund. Moneys in the
fund shall be used for the early learning system. Expenditures from the fund
may be made by the office without appropriation or allotment. [L Sp 2008, c 14,
pt of §2; am L 2009, c 194, §4; am L 2012, c 178, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next